src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-sinaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - sinā ~ sa: # pronouns 7 'eng /est sina/fin' - full paradigm
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Nom: [sinā, sa]
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Gen: [siʼn, sin]
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Par: sīnda
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Dat: [siʼnnõn, sinnõn]
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Ins: [siʼnkõks, sinkõks]
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Ill: [[siʼnnõ, siʼnnõz], [sinnõ, siʼnnõz]]
     sinā+Pron+Sg+Ela: [siʼnstõ, sinstõ]
